Maine, session 132, LD848.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §286-M, sub-§12, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 636, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
12. Report. The division shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over insurance and financial services matters in the Second
Regular Session of the 124th Legislature, and biennially thereafter, on the status of the
program, program participation, including enrollment data, and the financing of the
program, including the status of the fund, expenditures from the fund, current and projected
premium costs to the program and to program enrollees and a projection of funding needs
for the next 5 years. The report must provide options, based on projections of future need,
for changing the method of funding any state-paid premium subsidy, if such a subsidy is
authorized by law, and employee contributions.
Sec. 2. Open enrollment of Retired County and Municipal Law
Enforcement Officers and Municipal Firefighters Health Insurance Program
for current employees. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section
286-M, subsection 5, from October 1, 2025 to November 30, 2025, a county or municipal
law enforcement officer or a municipal firefighter who is employed in the position of a
county or municipal law enforcement officer or a municipal firefighter, who has held the
position for longer than 5 years and who previously elected not to enroll in the Retired
County and Municipal Law Enforcement Officers and Municipal Firefighters Health
Insurance Program established in Title 5, section 286-M, subsection 1 may elect to enroll
in the program. If the eligible person enrolls in the program 5 or more years following the
effective date of hire, the eligible person shall contribute to the fund 3% of the eligible
person's gross wages since the eligible person’s effective date of hire to that person’s date
of enrollment in the program.
For the purposes of this section, "county or municipal law enforcement officer" and
"municipal firefighter" have the same meanings as in Title 5, section 286-M, subsection 2,
paragraphs A and H, respectively.
Page 1 - 132LR1771(03)